North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 2. Withdrawal.

§ 55-15-20.
Withdrawal of foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this State may not withdraw from this State until it obtains a certificate of withdrawal from the Secretary of State.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this State may apply for a certificate of withdrawal by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing. The application must set forth:

The name of the foreign corporation and the name of the state or country under whose law it is incorporated;

That it is not transacting business in this State and that it surrenders its authority to transact business in this State;

That the corporation revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service of process and consents that service of process in any action or proceeding based upon any cause of action arising in this State, or arising out of business transacted in this State, during the time the corporation was authorized to transact business in this State may thereafter be made on such corporation by service thereof on the Secretary of State;

A mailing address to which the Secretary of State may mail a copy of any process served on the Secretary of State under subdivision (3); and

A commitment to file with the Secretary of State a statement of any subsequent change in its mailing address.

(b1)

If the Secretary of State finds that such application conforms to law, he shall:

(1)

Endorse on the application and an exact or conformed copy thereof the word “filed”, and the hour, day, month and year of the filing thereof;

(2)

File the application in his office;

(3)

Issue a certificate of withdrawal to which he shall affix the exact or conformed copy of the application; and

(4)

Send to the foreign corporation or its representative the certificate of withdrawal together with the exact or conformed copy of the application affixed thereto.

After the withdrawal of the foreign corporation is effective, service of process on the Secretary of State in accordance with subsection (b) of this section shall be made by delivering to and leaving with the Secretary of State, or with any clerk authorized by the Secretary of State to accept service of process, duplicate copies of the process and the fee required by G.S. 55-1-22(b). Upon receipt of process in the manner provided in this subsection, the Secretary of State shall immediately mail a copy of the process by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the foreign corporation at the mailing address designated pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 193; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 12.23; 2001-387, ss. 29, 30.

§ 55-15-21.
Withdrawal of foreign corporation by reason of a merger, consolidation, or conversion.

Whenever a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this State ceases its separate existence as a result of a statutory merger or consolidation permitted by the laws of the state or country under which it was incorporated, or converts into another entity as permitted by those laws, the surviving or resulting entity shall apply for a certificate of withdrawal for the foreign corporation by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing a copy of the articles of merger, consolidation, or conversion or a certificate reciting the facts of the merger, consolidation, or conversion, duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under the laws of which such foreign corporation was incorporated. If the surviving or resulting entity is not authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this State the articles or certificate must be accompanied by an application that sets forth:

The name of the foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this State, the type of entity and name of the surviving or resulting entity, and a statement that the surviving or resulting entity is not authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this State;

A statement that the surviving or resulting entity consents that service of process based upon any cause of action arising in this State, or arising out of business transacted in this State, during the time the foreign corporation was authorized to transact business in this State may thereafter be made by service thereof on the Secretary of State;

A mailing address to which the Secretary of State may mail a copy of any process served on the Secretary of State under subdivision (a)(2) of this section; and

A commitment to file with the Secretary of State a statement of any subsequent change in its mailing address.

If the Secretary of State finds that the articles or certificate and the application for withdrawal, if required, conform to law the Secretary of State shall:

Endorse on the articles or certificate and the application for withdrawal, if required, the word “filed” and the hour, day, month and year of the filing thereof;

File the articles or certificate and the application, if required;

Issue a certificate of withdrawal; and

Send to the surviving or resulting entity or its representative the certificate of withdrawal, together with the exact or conformed copy of the application, if required, affixed thereto.

After the withdrawal of the foreign corporation is effective, service of process on the Secretary of State in accordance with subsection (a) of this section shall be made by delivering to and leaving with the Secretary of State, or with any clerk authorized by the Secretary of State to accept service of process, duplicate copies of the process and the fee required by G.S. 55-1-22(b). Upon receipt of process in the manner provided in this subsection, the Secretary of State shall immediately mail a copy of the process by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the surviving or resulting entity at the mailing address designated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

History.

1991, c. 645, s. 13; 1999-369, s. 1.9; 2001-387, s. 31.

§§ 55-15-22 through 55-15-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.